Washington statutes.
RCW 18.83.135

Examining board—Powers and duties. (Effective until October 1, 2025.)

In addition to the authority prescribed under RCW 18.130.050, the board shall have the following authority:

(1) To maintain records of all activities, and to publish and distribute to all psychologists at least once each year abstracts of significant activities of the board;

(2) To obtain the written consent of the complaining client or patient or their legal representative, or of any person who may be affected by the complaint, in order to obtain information which otherwise might be confidential or privileged; and

(3) To apply the provisions of the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, to all persons licensed as psychologists under this chapter.

[ 2000 c 93 s 7; 1999 c 66 s 2; 1994 c 35 s 4; 1992 c 12 s 1; 1987 c 150 s 53; 1984 c 279 s 86.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.

PDFRCW 18.83.135

Examining board—Powers and duties. (Effective October 1, 2025.)

In addition to the authority prescribed under RCW 18.130.050, the board shall have the following authority:

(1) To maintain records of all activities, and to publish and distribute to all psychologists and licensed psychological associates at least once each year abstracts of significant activities of the board;

(2) To obtain the written consent of the complaining client or patient or their legal representative, or of any person who may be affected by the complaint, in order to obtain information which otherwise might be confidential or privileged; and

(3) To apply the provisions of the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, to all persons licensed as psychologists or licensed psychological associates under this chapter.

[ 2024 c 371 s 8; 2000 c 93 s 7; 1999 c 66 s 2; 1994 c 35 s 4; 1992 c 12 s 1; 1987 c 150 s 53; 1984 c 279 s 86.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2024 c 371 ss 1-12, 14, and 16: See note following RCW 18.19.020.

Rule making—2024 c 371 ss 1-16: See note following RCW 18.83.020.

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.